src/propernoun-smj-morph.txt
LEXICON MARJA-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON MARJA-I-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON MARJA-U-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON MARJA-A-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON MARJA-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> MARJADECL ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-A-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> MARJADECL ;


LEXICON MARJA-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON MARJA-I-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !


LEXICON MARJA-A-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON MARJA-U-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON MARJA-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> MARJADECL ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-A-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> MARJADECL ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-I-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> MARJADECL ;


LEXICON MARJA-U-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> MARJADECL ;

LEXICON MARJA-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-A-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJA-U-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJA-I-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJA-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names)
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-A-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names)
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-I-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names)
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 VUONAK ;

 
LEXICON MARJA-U-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names)
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 VUONAK ;

 
LEXICON MARJA-LOAN-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names)
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-LOAN-DC ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 VUONAK ;


LEXICON MARJA-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON MARJA-U-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
 LEXICON MARJA-I-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

 LEXICON MARJA-A-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> MARJADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

!LEXICON MARJA ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop:%> MARJADECL ;

LEXICON MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill change (person names)
 @U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-DC_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJADECL ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill change (person names)
 @U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-DC ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !

LEXICON MARJA-DC
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Gen:Q1 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:Q1 RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:Q1v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:Q1n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:Q1s K ;
 +Pl+Nom:Q1 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j RHyph ;     
 +Pl+Acc:Q1jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Q1jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:Q1jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:Q1js K ;
 +Pl+Com:Q1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:Q1X5jn K ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-DC_PLC-ORG
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Gen:Q1 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:Q1 RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:Q1v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:Q1n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:Q1s K ;
! +Pl+Nom:Q1 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:Q1j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:Q1j RHyph ;     
! +Pl+Acc:Q1jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:Q1jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:Q1jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:Q1js K ;
! +Pl+Com:Q1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:Q1X5jn K ;

 
LEXICON MARJA-LOAN-DC
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:X4j K ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:Q1 K ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:Q1 RHyph ;  !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:Q1v K ; !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:Q1n K ; !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:Q1s K ; !
! +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:Q1 K ; !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:Q1j K ; !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:Q1j RHyph ; !
! +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:Q1jt K ; !
! +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:Q1jda K ; !
! +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:Q1jn K ; !
! +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:Q1js K ; !
! +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:Q1j K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:Q1X5jn K ; !

 

LEXICON JOKULL-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ; ! NB added to make the code compile, needs revision.

LEXICON JAVRRIE-plc ! this is a lex for Umesami names on -ie that have CG
 +N+Prop+Plc: JAVRRIEDECL ;


LEXICON JAVRRIEDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ JAVRRIE-DC ;


LEXICON JAVRRIE-DC
 +Sg+Nom:i%>e K ;
 +Sg+Nom:i%>e RHyph ;        
 +Ess:i%>en K ;
 +Sg+Ill:á%>X4j K ;
 +Sg+Gen:i%>Q1e K ;
 +Sg+Gen:i%>Q1e RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:i%>Q1ev K ;
 +Sg+Ine:i%>Q1en K ;
 +Sg+Ela:i%>Q1es K ;
! +Pl+Nom:i%>Q1e K ;
! +Pl+Gen:i%>Q1j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:i%>Q1j RHyph ;     
! +Pl+Acc:i%>Q1jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:i%>Q1jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:i%>Q1jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:i%>Q1js K ;
! +Pl+Com:i%>Q1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:i%>Q1X5jn K ;


!LEXICON NIKOSIIJA-plc !XXX Check.
! +N+Prop+Plc:%> NIKOSIIJADECL ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj:%>laddj DEARVVASLAS ;	!SUB
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Attr:%>laddj ATTR ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A:%>laddj JOHTOLAT ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A:%>laddja ISSORASSA- ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom:%>laddja PxV ; ! tentative.
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Ess:%>laddjan K ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Ess:%>laddjan PxC ; ! tentative, check.
! +N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A:%>laddja EABBUCASE2 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%> VUONAK ;

!LEXICON NIKOSIIJADECL !Names with ending -iija, a-illative
!ACCRA-DC_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> NYSTØDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON NYSTØ-femsur
 NYSTØ-fem ;
 NYSTØ-sur ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON NYSTØ-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%>  NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%>  NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%>  NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON NYSTØ-surplc
 NYSTØ-sur ;
 NYSTØ-plc ;
! better once than twice
! +N+Prop+Sur:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB
! +N+Prop+Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>a VUONAK ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>a VUONAK ; !

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>a VUONAK ;

LEXICON NYSTØ ! Vowel-final, heavy syll
 +N+Prop:%> NYSTØDECL ;
 
LEXICON NYSTØDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL ;

LEXICON NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ;

LEXICON NYSTØDECL-LOAN
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ;


LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL 
 +Sg+Nom: K ;	
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;			
! +Sg+Ela:%:s K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
! +Sg+Ine:%:n K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
 +Sg+Gen#+Use/Sub:a# RHyph ; ! !for placenames 
 +Sg+Gen#:# RHyph ; ! for placenames 
     NYOBL ;
 +Use/Sub:%: NYOBL ; ! ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
 +Use/Sub:%- NYOBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:1 NYOBL ; !
 
LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL_PLC-ORG
 +Sg+Nom: K ;	
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;			
! +Sg+Ela:%:s K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
! +Sg+Ine:%:n K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
 +Sg+Gen#+Use/Sub:a# RHyph ; ! !for placenames 
 +Sg+Gen#:# RHyph ; ! for placenames 
     NYOBL_PLC-ORG ;
 +Use/Sub:%: NYOBL_PLC-ORG ; ! ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
 +Use/Sub:%- NYOBL_PLC-ORG ; !
 +Use/Sub:1 NYOBL_PLC-ORG ; !

 
LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN
 +Sg+Nom: K ;	
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;			
! +Sg+Ela:%:s K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
! +Sg+Ine:%:n K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
 +Sg+Gen#+Use/Sub:a# RHyph ; ! !for placenames 
 +Sg+Gen#+Use/Sub:# RHyph ; ! ! for placenames 
 +Use/Sub: NYOBL_PLC-ORG ; !
 +Use/Sub:%: NYOBL_PLC-ORG ; ! ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
 +Use/Sub:%- NYOBL_PLC-ORG ; !
 +Use/Sub:1 NYOBL_PLC-ORG ; !


!LEXICON NYSTØ-DC
! +laš:lažž DEARVVASLAS ;

LEXICON NYOBL
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: RHyph ;       
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j RHyph ;      
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:a K ;  !
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:a RHyph ;     !   
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj K ;  !
 +Ess+Use/Sub:an K ;  !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a K ;  !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:a RHyph ;     !  !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:av K ;   !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:an K ;  !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:as K ;  !
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:a K ;   !
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:aj K ;   !
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:aj RHyph ;     ! !
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajt K ;   !
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajda K ;   !
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:ajn K ;   !
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ajs K ;   !
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:aj K ;   !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ajn K ;  !

LEXICON NYOBL_PLC-ORG
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: RHyph ;       
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;
! +Pl+Nom: K ;
! +Pl+Gen:j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:j RHyph ;      
! +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:js K ;
! +Pl+Com:j K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:a K ;  !
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:a RHyph ;     !   
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj K ;  !
 +Ess+Use/Sub:an K ;  !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a K ;  !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:a RHyph ;     !  !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:av K ;   !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:an K ;  !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:as K ;  !
! +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:a K ;   !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:aj K ;   !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:aj RHyph ;     ! !
! +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajt K ;   !
! +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajda K ;   !
! +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:ajn K ;   !
! +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ajs K ;   !
! +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:aj K ;   !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ajn K ;  !


LEXICON BERN-ani
!Different lexicon for animals. Eurokas.
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-mal
! Different lexicon for male persons. Finn. Torfinn.
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON BERN-surmal
! Different lexicon for male persons & personal surnames. 
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON BERN-fem
! Different lexicon for female persons. Audhild.
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !


LEXICON BERN-femplc
! Different lexicon for female persons. Audhild.
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>a VUONAK ;
 
!LEXICON BERN-femsur ! Not in use.
! Different lexicon for female persons & personal surnames. 
! +N+Prop+Fem:%> BERNDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON BERN-sur
! Different lexicon for personal surnames. Blind
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !


LEXICON BERN-LOAN-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>a VUONAK ; !


LEXICON BERN-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>a VUONAK ;

!LEXICON BERN-surplc
!! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>a VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON BERN-objsur
! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-orgsur
! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Org:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON BERN-obj
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> BERNDECL ;


LEXICON BERN-org
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Org:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-org
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Org:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-obj
! Different lexicon for objects, concrete and abstract. Word. 
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
